Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-104.05
George W. Norris Day; proclamation by Governor; commemoration.

The Governor of the State of Nebraska shall issue a proclamation calling upon the officials of state government and subdivisions thereof to display the flags of the United States and Nebraska on all public buildings on January 5 of each year and inviting the people of the State of Nebraska to observe the day in schools and other suitable places with appropriate ceremonies in commemoration of the life's work and contributions of George W. Norris.

Laws 1981, LB 18, § 2.